Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1741
Foreign support order; voluntary income withholding; procedure.

Any person who is the obligor on a foreign support order may obtain voluntary income withholding by filing with the court a request for such withholding and a certified copy of the foreign support order. The court shall issue an income withholding order pursuant to section 43-1737. Payment shall be made to the State Disbursement Unit.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 61;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 27.